Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 2. Minimum Wages

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

48 Am. Jur. 2d Labor and Labor Relations §§ 2553 to 2591.

Employee training time as exempt from minimum wage and overtime requirements of Fair Labor Standards Act, 80 ALR Fed 246.

What constitutes “amusement or recreational establishment” within meaning of seasonal amusement exemption from Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USC § 213(a)(3)), 88 ALR Fed 880.

30 C.J.S. Employer - Employee Relationship §§ 132 to 180; 47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 12, 362.

§ 27-4-201.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

27-4-201

through

27-4-204

]:

“Wage” means compensation due to an employee by reason of his employment;

“Employ” includes to suffer or to permit to work;

“Employer” includes any individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;

“Employee” includes any individual employed by an employer but shall not include:

Any individual employed in agriculture;

Any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private home;

Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity;

Any individual employed by the United States, or by the state or any political subdivision thereof;

Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does not, in fact, exist or where the services rendered to such organization are on a voluntary basis;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 1, § 2.

Any individual employed as an outside salesman whose compensation is solely commission on sales;

Any individual whose employment is driving an ambulance or other vehicle from time to time as necessity requires but who is on call at any time;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 1, § 2.

In this act, “shall” is used in an imperative sense and “may” is used in a permissive sense;

“Occupation” means any occupation, service, trade, business, industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment in which individuals are gainfully employed.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-207; Laws 1971, ch. 201, § 1; 2001, ch. 1, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(iv)(I) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section is of similar import to Fair Labor Standards Act

of 1938, ch. 676, § 6, 52 Stat. 1062, as amended, 29 USCS § 206, and, therefore, the pronouncements of federal courts when construing and applying the congressional act merit careful attention. Padilla v. Henning Hotel Co., 78 Wyo. 144, 319 P.2d 874,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1958).

Employees whose hours not controlled cannot claim minimum hourly wage. —

Where the employee is not directed or controlled by an employer who prescribes the hours of work, their number, or the manner or nature of services required, it would offend reason to hold such employees may say they worked 24 hours or any other excessive number of hours each day and then claim a minimum per hour wage. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Trial court's award of “wages” held not to mean Wage-Hour Law applied. —

Although the trial court termed its allowance as “wages,” that terminology does not necessarily mean that the amount awarded was computed on the basis of hourly wage, or that the nature of the employment was in a capacity covered by the Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Tips as wages. —

In the absence of an express agreement to the contrary, tips are not wages. Padilla v. Henning Hotel Co., 78 Wyo. 144, 319 P.2d 874,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1958).

A contract entered into prior to the effective date of the statute and not made in contemplation thereof, stating that the employee would receive “the stipulated monthly salary, plus such tips as the employee might receive from others,” did not make tips a part of the wages required to be paid by the statute. Padilla v. Henning Hotel Co., 78 Wyo. 144, 319 P.2d 874,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1958).

Employees held to be administrators or executives. —

The fact that accounting was made to the employers of receipts and disbursements does not alter the fact that the employees' management and operation of the business was administrative and, in part at least, executive, in that they had exercised powers of decision — when to work, how to work — and many other related activities. Hurst v. Davis, 386 P.2d 943,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

NL Indus., Inc. v. Dill, 769 P.2d 920,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of minimum wage statutes relating to private employment, 30 ALR2d 1219.

Delegation of judicial power by minimum wage statutes relating to private employment, 39 ALR2d 756.

Who is employed in “professional capacity” within exemption, under 29 USC § 213(a)(1), from minimum wage and maximum hours provisions of Fair Labor Standards Act, 77 ALR Fed 681.

Employer's duty to furnish wage information to employees' representative under National Labor Relations Act, 112 ALR Fed 81.

Who is employed in “executive capacity” within exemption, under 29 USCS § 213(A)(1), from minimum wage and maximum hours provisions of Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USCS §§ 201 et seq.), 131 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes “preschool” for purposes of § 3(S)(1)(B) of Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USCS § 203(S)(1)(B)), providing that preschools are subject to wage and hour provisions of act, 131 ALR Fed 207.

Who is “employee employed in agriculture” and therefore exempt from overtime provisions of Fair Labor Standards Act by § 13 (b)(12) of Act (29 U.S.C. § 213(b)(12)), 162 ALR Fed 575.

Validity and construction of domestic service provisions of fair labor standards act (29 U.S.C. §§ 201 et seq.), 165 ALR Fed 163.

§ 27-4-202.
Minimum wage rates.

Every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and fifteen cents ($5.15) per hour.

Effective April 1, 2001 and thereafter, all employers who employ tipped employees shall not pay less than two dollars and thirteen cents ($2.13) per hour to his tipped employees. Provided further, if the wage paid by the employer combined with the tips received by the employee during a given pay period does not equal at least the applicable minimum wage as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section, the employer shall pay the difference to the tipped employee. For the purposes of this act, all “tip” employees shall furnish monthly to their respective employers the daily record of tips required to be kept by “tip” employees under the laws of the United States and upon the forms prescribed by the internal revenue service of the United States treasury department. The daily record of tips shall constitute prima facie proof of the amount of tips received by the employee. Proof of a customary tipping percentage of sales or service shall also be an admissible form of proof of the amount of tips. A “tip” employee is one who customarily and regularly receives more than thirty dollars ($30.00) a month in tips.

In lieu of the rate prescribed in subsection (a) of this section, any employer may pay any employee who has not attained the age of twenty (20) years a wage which is not less than four dollars and twenty-five cents ($4.25) per hour during the first ninety (90) consecutive days after the employee is initially employed by the employer. No employer may take any action to displace employees, including partial displacements such as reduction in hours, wages or employment benefits for purposes of hiring individuals at the wage authorized in this subsection.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 121, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-208; Laws 1965, ch. 97, § 1; 1967, ch. 164, § 1; 1971, ch. 201, § 2; 2001, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

For section declaring it unlawful for an employer to pay wages lower than that agreed upon with employee, or to fail to pay fringe benefits agreed upon, see §

27-4-507

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who is executive, administrator, supervisor or the like, under exemption for such employees from state minimum wage and overtime pay statutes, 85 ALR4th 519.

§ 27-4-203.
Record of work of employees required.

Every employer subject to this act [§§

27-4-201

through

27-4-204

] shall make, and keep for a period of not less than two (2) years in or about the premises wherein any employee is employed, a record of the name, address and occupation of each of his employees, the rate of pay, and the amount paid each pay period to each such employee, the hours worked each day and each work week by such employee.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 121, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 27-209.

§ 27-4-204.
Liability for unpaid minimum wage; suit for collection.

Any employer who shall pay to any employee wages at a rate less than that prescribed in the foregoing section [§

27-4-202

] shall be liable in a civil action, to the employee in the amount of his or her unpaid minimum wage, and the aggrieved employee may bring a civil action for enforcement of this act [§§

27-4-201

through

27-4-204

] and the recovery of his or her unpaid wages together with reasonable attorney fees and the costs of the action.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 71, § 2.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 121, § 4; 1957, ch. 139, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-210; Laws 1965, ch. 97, § 2; 1967, ch. 164, § 2; 1971, ch. 201, § 3; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1990, ch. 71, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to assignment of claim to commissioner for collection, see §

27-4-504

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Employer's duty to furnish wage information to employees' representative under National Labor Relations Act, 112 ALR Fed 81.